Utah statutes.
10-9a-210.   Notice to municipality when a private institution of higher
education is constructing student housing.
(1)  Each private institution of higher education that intends to construct
student housing on property owned by the institution shall provide written
notice of the intended construction, as provided in Subsection (2), before any
funds are committed to the construction, if any of the proposed student
housing buildings is within 300 feet of privately owned residential property.
(2)  Each notice under Subsection (1) shall be provided to the legislative
body and, if applicable, the mayor of:
(a)  the county in whose unincorporated area the privately owned residential
property is located; or
(b)  the municipality in whose boundaries the privately owned residential
property is located.
(3)  At the request of a county or municipality that is entitled to notice
under this section, the institution and the legislative body of the affected
county or municipality shall jointly hold a public hearing to provide
information to the public and receive input from the public about the proposed
construction.
